South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4802.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-48-30(9) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (9) "Likely to engage in acts of sexual violence" means that a person is predisposedperson's propensity to engage incommit acts of sexual violence and more probably than not will engage in acts of sexual violence to such a degreeis of such a degree as to pose a menace to the health and safety of others. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----